test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-vwrkko_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - võrkko :   # should decline like the paradigm 'p_luikko'
    võrkko+N+Sg+Nom: võrkko
    võrkko+N+Pl+Nom: võrkod
    võrkko+N+Sg+Gen: võrko
    võrkko+N+Pl+Gen: [võrkkoi, võrkkojõ]
    võrkko+N+Sg+Par: võrkkoa
    võrkko+N+Pl+Par: võrkkoitõ
    võrkko+N+Sg+Ill: võrkkosõ
    võrkko+N+Pl+Ill: võrkkoisõ
    võrkko+N+Sg+Ine: võrkoz
    võrkko+N+Pl+Ine: võrkkoiz
    võrkko+N+Sg+Ela: võrkossõ
    võrkko+N+Pl+Ela: võrkkoissõ
    võrkko+N+Sg+All: võrkollõ
    võrkko+N+Pl+All: võrkkoillõ
    võrkko+N+Sg+Ade: võrkol
    võrkko+N+Pl+Ade: võrkkoil
    võrkko+N+Sg+Abl: võrkoltõ
    võrkko+N+Pl+Abl: võrkkoiltõ
    võrkko+N+Sg+Tra: võrkossi
    võrkko+N+Pl+Tra: võrkkoissi
    võrkko+N+Sg+Ter: võrkkassaa
    võrkko+N+Pl+Ter: võrkkoissaa
    võrkko+N+Sg+Com: võrkoka
    võrkko+N+Pl+Com: võrkkoika
